Hawaii statutes.
§576B-713 Record in original language;
English translation. A record filed with a tribunal of this State under
this article shall be in the original language and, if not in English, shall be
accompanied by an English translation. [L 2015, c 77, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next